Arkansas, session 2025, SB577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-74-208(b)(3)(D), concerning the form of
the ballot for levying a county sales and use tax for capital improvements,
is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(iii)(a) At least one hundred twenty (120) days
before the expiration of a sales and use tax levied under this subchapter,
the Department of Finance and Administration shall notify the county quorum
court of the county that levied the tax concerning the expiration of the
sales and use tax.
(b) The notification required under
subdivision (b)(3)(D)(iii)(a) of this section shall state the:
(1) Current expiration date of the sales
*JLL324*
03/31/2025 9:03:00 AM JLL324

SB577
and use tax; and
(2) Specific requirements under this
subchapter for extending the sales and use tax.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-74-308(b)(3)(D), concerning the form of
the ballot for levying a county sales and use tax for capital improvements,
is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(iii)(a) At least one hundred twenty (120) days
before the expiration of a sales and use tax levied under this subchapter,
the Department of Finance and Administration shall notify the county quorum
court of the county that levied the tax concerning the expiration of the
sales and use tax.
(b) The notification required under
subdivision (b)(3)(D)(iii)(a) of this section shall state the:
(1) Current expiration date of the sales
and use tax; and
(2) Specific requirements under this
subchapter for extending the sales and use tax.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-74-603(c), concerning the call for a tax
election for a county sales and use tax for capital improvements of a
community college, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
(5)(A) At least one hundred twenty (120) days before the
expiration of a sales and use tax levied under this subchapter, the
Department of Finance and Administration shall notify the county quorum court
of the county that levied the tax concerning the expiration of the sales and
use tax.
(B) The notification required under subdivision (c)(5)(A)
of this section shall state the:
(i) Current expiration date of the sales and use
tax; and
(ii) Specific requirements under this subchapter for
extending the sales and use tax.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 26-75-208(b)(3)(D), concerning the election
03/31/2025 9:03:00 AM JLL324

SB577
required for levying a city sales and use tax for capital improvements, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(iii)(a) At least one hundred twenty (120) days
before the expiration of a sales and use tax levied under this subchapter,
the Department of Finance and Administration shall notify the governing body
of the city that levied the sales and use tax concerning the expiration of
the sales and use tax.
(b) The notification required under
subdivision (b)(3)(D)(iii)(a) of this section shall state the:
(1) Current expiration date of the sales
and use tax; and
(2) Specific requirements under this
subchapter for extending the sales and use tax.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-75-308(c)(3)(D), concerning the election
to approve a city sales and use tax for capital improvements, is amended to
add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(iii)(a) At least one hundred twenty (120) days
before the expiration of a sales and use tax levied under this subchapter,
the Department of Finance and Administration shall notify the governing body
of the city that levied the sales and use tax concerning the expiration of
the sales and use tax.
(b) The notification required under
subdivision (c)(3)(D)(iii)(a) of this section shall state the:
(1) Current expiration date of the sales
and use tax; and
(2) Specific requirements under this
subchapter for extending the sales and use tax.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 26-82-104(b)(3)(D), concerning the election
on the levy of a sales and use tax under the Local Sales and Use Tax Economic
Development Project Funding Act, is amended to add an additional subdivision
to read as follows:
(iii)(a) At least one hundred twenty (120) days
before the expiration of a sales and use tax levied under this subchapter,
the Department of Finance and Administration shall notify the levying entity
03/31/2025 9:03:00 AM JLL324

SB577
concerning the expiration of the sales and use tax.
(b) The notification required under
subdivision (b)(3)(D)(iii)(a) of this section shall state the:
(1) Current expiration date of the sales
and use tax; and
(2) Specific requirements under this
subchapter for extending the sales and use tax.





























03/31/2025 9:03:00 AM JLL324